Washington statutes.
RCW 35.41.100

Chapter is alternative and additional method.

The authority granted by this chapter shall be considered an alternative and additional method of issuing revenue bonds or warrants by cities and towns and no restriction, limitation, or regulation relative to the issuance of such bonds contained in any other law shall apply to the bonds issued hereunder.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.41.100. Prior: 1957 c 117 s 10.]